Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.030

Punishment of misdemeanor when not fixed by statute.

Every person convicted of a misdemeanor for which no punishment is prescribed by any statute in force at the time of conviction and sentence, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a maximum term fixed by the court of not more than ninety days, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than one thousand dollars or both such imprisonment and fine.

[ 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 7; 1909 c 249 s 14; Code 1881 s 785; RRS s 2266.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 47: See note following RCW 9.41.190.